Arizona, session 57th-2nd-regular, HB2562.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Arizona: Section 1. Heading change The chapter heading of title 44, chapter 38, Arizona Revised Statutes, is changed from "BUSINESSES EXEMPT FROM MASK MANDATE" to "BUSINESSES GENERALLY". Sec. 2. Title 44, chapter 38, article 1, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended by adding section 44-7952, to read: START_STATUTE44-7952. Water conservation; restaurants; food service establishments; hotels; motels A. Restaurants and other food service establishments in this state may only serve water to customers on request. B. Operators of hotels and motels in this state shall provide customers with the option to choose not to have towels and linens laundered daily and shall prominently display a notice of this option. END_STATUTE